dictsource/ug_rules
// Uyghur

.group a
        a        A

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        ch       tS

.group d
        d        d

.group e
        e        &

.group é
        é        e

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        g'h      gh
        gh       Q"

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        I

.group j
        j        dZ

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        n'g      ng
        ng       N

.group o
        o        o

.group ö
        ö        W

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        q

.group r
        r        R

.group s
        s        s
        s'h      sh
        sh       S

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        u

.group ü
        ü        y

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        X

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z
        z'h      zh
        zh       Z

.group ئ
        ئ
        ئا       A
        ئە       &
        ئې       e
        ئى       I
        ئو       o
        ئۆ       W
        ئۇ       u
        ئۈ       y

.group ا
        ا        A

.group ب
        ب        b

.group چ
        چ        tS

.group د
        د        d

.group ە
        ە        &

.group ې
        ې        e

.group ف
        ف        f

.group گ
        گ        g
        گھ       gh

.group غ
        غ        Q"

.group ھ
        ھ        h

.group ى
        ى        I

.group ج
        ج        dZ

.group ك
        ك        k

.group ل
        ل        l

.group م
        م        m

.group ن
        ن        n
        نگ       ng

.group ڭ
        ڭ        N

.group و
        و        o

.group ۆ
        ۆ        W

.group پ
        پ        p

.group ق
        ق        q

.group ر
        ر        R

.group س
        س        s
        سھ       sh

.group ش
        ش        S

.group ت
        ت        t

.group ۇ
        ۇ        u

.group ۈ
        ۈ        y

.group ۋ
        ۋ        w

.group خ
        خ        X

.group ي
        ي        j

.group ز
        ز        z
        زھ       zh

.group ژ
        ژ        Z
